Utah statutes.
61-2g-304.   Application for licensure, certification, or registration.

(1)  An application for the following shall be sent to the division on a form approved by the division:

(a)  original certification, licensure, or registration; and

(b)  renewal of certification, licensure, or registration.

(2)  The payment of the appropriate fee, as established by the division, with the concurrence of the board, in accordance with Section 63J-1-504, must accompany an application for:

(a)  original certification, licensure, or registration; and

(b)  renewal of certification, licensure, or registration.

(3)  At the time of filing an application described in Subsection (1), an applicant shall:

(a)  sign a pledge to comply with the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice and the ethical rules to be observed by an appraiser that are established under Section 61-2g-403 for:

(i)  a certified or licensed appraiser; or

(ii)  a trainee; and

(b)  certify that the applicant understands the types of misconduct, as set forth in this chapter, for which a disciplinary proceeding may be initiated against a person certified, licensed, or registered under this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 166, 2012 General Session

